Utah statutes.
10-2-416.   Commission decision -- Time limit -- Limitation on approval of annexation.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (3), after the public hearing under Subsection 10-2-415(1) the boundary commission may:

(a)  approve the proposed annexation, either with or without conditions;

(b)  make minor modifications to the proposed annexation and approve it, either with or without conditions; or

(c)  disapprove the proposed annexation.

(2)  The commission shall issue a written decision on the proposed annexation within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing under Section 10-2-415 and shall send a copy of the decision to:

(a)  the legislative body of the county in which the area proposed for annexation is located;

(b)  the legislative body of the proposed annexing municipality;

(c)  the contact person on the annexation petition;

(d)  the contact person of each entity that filed a protest; and

(e)  if a protest was filed under Subsection 10-2-407(1)(a)(ii) with respect to a proposed annexation of an area located in a county of the first class, the contact person designated in the protest.

(3) Except for an annexation for which a feasibility study may not be required under Subsection 10-2-413(1)(b), the commission may not approve a proposed annexation of an area located within a county of the first class unless the results of the feasibility study under Section 10-2-413 show that the average annual amount under Subsection 10-2-413(3)(a)(ix) does not exceed the average annual amount under Subsection 10-2-413(3)(a)(viii) by more than 5%.

